District of Columbia statutes.
5-121.02

Duty in making arrest.

It shall be the duty of every person prosecuting the business of a private detective, who may arrest a person for crime, to bring the person arrested, with all evidence of the alleged crime, including property or money which may become evidence, immediately to the office of the Chief of Police, or to the proper court, where the case shall undergo an examination.

R.S., D.C., § 429
“Detectives” defined and licensing of private detectives, see § 47-2839.
1981 Ed., § 4-172.
1973 Ed., § 4-172.
Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.